Arkansas statutes. Title 18 Property
Chapter 60

Miscellaneous Proceedings Relating to Property

Subchapter 1

— General Provisions

Effective Dates.

Acts 1875, p.128, § 7: effective on passage.

Acts 1921, No. 224, § 3: approved Mar. 3, 1921. Emergency clause provided: “This act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, an emergency is hereby declared, and this act shall take effect and be in full force from and after its passage.”

Acts 1937, No. 7, § 2: approved Jan. 26, 1937. Emergency clause provided: “Whereas thousands of acres of land are now held by bona fide purchasers and donees from the State and are now paying revenue to the State in the form of taxes, and whereas these people are in jeopardy by reason of certain defects in the tax sales under which they purchased, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act shall take effect from and after its passage.”

Acts 1937, No. 29, § 2: approved Feb. 4, 1937. Emergency clause provided: “Whereas, it is found that many timber owners are having their property raided by thieves and, Whereas, there is now no proper penalty for the wrongful cutting of timber an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, it shall take effect and be in full force from and after its passage.”

Acts 1957, No. 88, § 3: Feb. 26, 1957. Emergency clause provided: “It has been found and is declared by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the laws of this State do not provide adequate damages for co-owners of land against trespassers who cut, destroy, and carry away timber and other property without the consent of such co-owners, that such co-owners are being deprived of much property each year because of such trespasses, and that the enactment of this Act will provide an adequate penalty against the taking of such property and will discourage such trespasses. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall take effect and be in force from the date of its approval.”

Acts 1993, No. 366, § 5: Mar. 5, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that present law subjects landowners to liability for injuries to trespassers caused by the landowners' gross negligence which is something less than the willful and wanton misconduct which should cause a defendant in rightful possession of real estate to be liable to a trespasser who is injured. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1993, No. 581, § 5: Mar. 18, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that present law subjects landowners to liability for injuries to trespassers caused by the landowners' gross negligence which is something less than the willful or wanton misconduct which should cause a defendant in rightful possession of real estate to be liable to a trespasser who is injured and that a change in the definition of trespasser as used in that section is urgently needed; that legislation (SB 45) is currently pending which would partially correct this problem but that it is urgent that this section be amended further even if Senate Bill 45 becomes law; that this act is designed to correct all the apparent problems in Arkansas Code 18-60-108 and to supersede the provisions of Senate Bill 45 in the event it becomes law; and that this act is urgently needed to correct the inadequate provisions of 18-60-108 whether or not Senate Bill 45 becomes law, and should be given effect immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

18-60-101. Right of cotenants to accounting.

(a)

When any joint tenant, tenant in common, or coparcener in any real estate, or any interest therein, shall take, use, or have the profits and benefits thereof in greater proportion than his or her interest therein, that person, or his or her executor or administrator, shall account therefor to his or her cotenant or cotenants, jointly or severally.

(b)

Joint tenants, tenants in common, and coparceners in any real or personal estate may maintain civil actions against their cotenants who receive as bailiffs more than their due proportion of the benefits of the estate.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 2, §§ 1, 2; C. & M. Dig., §§ 1087, 1088; Pope's Dig., §§ 1300, 1301; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 50-101, 50-102.

Cross References.

Feudal tenures prohibited, Ark. Const., Art. 2, § 28.

18-60-102. Injuring, destroying, or carrying away property of another.

(a)

A person trespassing as follows shall pay a person injured treble the value of a thing damaged, broken, destroyed, or carried away, with costs, if the person shall:

(1)

Cut down, injure, destroy, or carry away any tree placed or growing for use or shade or any timber, rails, or wood, standing, being, or growing on the land of another person;

(2)

Dig up, quarry, or carry away any stone, ground, clay, turf, mold, fruit, or plants; or

(3)

Cut down or carry away, any grass, grain, corn, cotton, tobacco, hemp, or flax, in which he or she has no interest or right, standing or being on any land not his or her own, or shall wilfully break the glass, or any part of it, in any building not his or her own.

(b)

If any person trespasses upon land in violation of the provisions of this section and if the land is owned by several joint tenants, tenants in common, coparceners, or other co-owners, then any co-owner who has not given consent to the trespass shall be entitled to treble the value of the thing so damaged, broken, destroyed, or carried away, with costs, the treble damages to be computed according to the amount of the undivided interest of the co-owner.

(c)

If on the trial of any action brought under the provisions of this section it shall appear that the defendant had probable cause to believe that the land on which the trespass is alleged to have been committed, or that the thing so taken, carried away, injured, or destroyed, was his or her own, the plaintiff in the action shall recover single damages only, with costs.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 153, § 4; C. & M. Dig., § 10322; Acts 1937, No. 29, § 1; Pope's Dig., § 1299; Acts 1957, No. 88, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 50-105, 50-107.

18-60-103. Liability for damages by fire — Exception.

(a)

If any person shall set on fire any grass or other combustible material within his or her enclosures so as to damage any other person, that person shall make satisfaction in single damages to the party injured, to be recovered by civil action in any court having jurisdiction of the amount sued for.

(b)

If any person shall, before setting out fire, notify those persons whose farms are joining the place which he or she proposes to burn that he or she is going to fire such grass or other combustible matter and shall use all due caution to prevent such fire from getting out to the injury of any other person, he or she shall not be liable to pay damages as provided in this section.

History.

Acts 1875, No. 48, § 5, p. 128; C. & M. Dig., § 10323; Pope's Dig., § 1298; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-104.

Cross References.

Reckless burning, penalty, §5-38-302.

18-60-104. Leaving enclosure open.

If any person shall voluntarily throw down or open any doors, bars, gates, or fences and leave them down or open, other than those that lead into his or her own enclosure, he or she shall pay the party injured the sum of five dollars ($5.00) for each offense and double the amount of damages the parties may sustain by reason of the doors, bars, gates, or fences being thrown open or down, with costs.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 153, § 2; C. & M. Dig., § 10321; Pope's Dig., § 5773; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-106.

Publisher's Notes.

Rev. Stat., ch. 153, § 3, provided that the penalties contained in this section could be recovered by an action of trespass or debt (abolished) founded upon the act before a justice of the peace where the damages claimed do not exceed one hundred dollars and in the circuit court if the damages claimed are over one hundred dollars.

18-60-105. Improvements erroneously placed on adjoining lands.

(a)

In all cases in which fences, buildings, or other improvements that may be moved have been erroneously placed or erected on lands adjoining land on which the fences, buildings, or other improvements were intended to be erected, the owner of the fences, buildings, or other improvements shall have twelve (12) months' time from the date of the discovery of the erroneous placing of the fences, buildings, or other improvements on the adjoining lands to remove the improvements and place them on his or her own land or premises.

(b)

The owner of the fences, buildings, or other improvements so placed erroneously on the adjoining lands shall not be held responsible for any damages to the owner of the adjoining lands on which the fences, buildings, or other improvements were erected by reason of the erroneous erecting or building of the fences, buildings, or other improvements on the adjoining lands.

History.

Acts 1921, No. 224, § 2; Pope's Dig., § 5782; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-103.

18-60-106. Sale of lands of infants or individuals with mental illness.

(a)

The sale of land of infants or individuals with mental illness shall not be deemed to be prohibited as being in contravention of the deed, will, or contract under which they hold unless a sale is expressly forbidden by the deed, will, or contract.

(b)

When the legal title of land is held by a trustee, he or she shall be a party to the proceedings for its sale. In all other respects the proceedings for the sale of land held in trust for infants and individuals with mental illness shall be the same as when they hold the legal title, except that the trustees shall give bond and security instead of the guardian when the proceeds of sale are to go into the hands of the trustee.

History.

Civil Code, § 537; C. & M. Dig., §§ 8125, 8126; Pope's Dig., §§ 10547, 10548; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 34-1837, 34-1838.

18-60-107. Liability for injuries in gathering farm products — Definition.

(a)

No cause of action shall arise against the owner, tenant, or lessee of land or premises for injuries to any person who is on that land or premises for the purpose of gleaning agricultural or farm products, unless that person's injuries were caused by the gross negligence or willful and wanton misconduct of the owner, tenant, or lessee.

(b)

No cause of action shall arise against the owner, tenant, or lessee of land or premises for injuries to any person, other than an employee or contractor of the owner, tenant, or lessee, who is on the land or premises for the purpose of picking and purchasing agricultural or farm products at a farm or “u-pick” operation, unless the person's injuries were caused by a condition which involved an unreasonable risk of harm and all of the following apply:

(1)

The owner, tenant, or lessee knew or had reason to know of the condition or risk;

(2)

The owner, tenant, or lessee failed to exercise reasonable care to make the condition safe or to warn the person of the condition or risk; and

(3)

The person injured did not know or did not have reason to know of the condition or risk.

(c)

As used in this section, “agricultural or farm products” means the natural products of the farm, nursery, grove, orchard, vineyard, garden, and apiary, including, but not limited to, trees and firewood.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 101, § 1.

18-60-108. Liability of landowner for injury to trespasser — Definition.

(a)(1)

An owner, lessee, or occupant of land does not owe a duty of care to a trespasser on the land and is not liable for any injury to a trespasser on the land.

(2)

No cause of action shall arise against the owner, lessee, or occupant of land until the presence of the trespasser on the premises is known, and then the owner, lessee, or occupant of the land shall be liable only for injuries caused by the willful or wanton misconduct of the owner, lessee, or occupant.

(b)

This section does not affect the doctrine of attractive nuisance, except that the doctrine may not be the basis for liability of an owner, lessee, or occupant of agricultural land for any injury to a trespasser over the age of eighteen (18).

(c)

As used in this section, “trespasser” means a person who enters on the property of another without permission and without an invitation, express or implied.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 473, §§ 1-3; 1993, No. 366, § 1; 1993, No. 581, § 1.

Subchapter 2

— Ejectment and Trespass

Cross References.

Limitation of actions of ejectment, §18-61-103.

Effective Dates.

Acts 1857, p. 80, § 5: effective on passage.

Acts 1945, No. 82, § 4: approved Feb. 21, 1945. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby ascertained and declared by the 55th General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that as the law now stands many improvement districts are in danger of losing a large amount of revenue which is justly due them from lands heretofore forfeited to such districts for nonpayment of taxes, and that in many instances such loss of revenue will cause such districts to default in the payment of their bond and interest requirements; and that to permit a person holding under a tax title from the State to avoid payment of improvement district taxes upon lands purchased from the State by him would result in an unequal distribution of taxation and thus throw more burden of taxation upon those taxpayers who have been paying their taxes; that it is not feasible for improvement districts to keep informed, as to the sale to the State and subsequent possession under a deed from the State, as to all of the lands within the boundaries of said district, and that an emergency, therefore, exists, and this act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall take effect and be in full force from and after its passage.”

Acts 1947, No. 87, § 3: Feb. 18, 1947. Emergency clause provided: “It is ascertained and hereby declared that this act is necessary to avoid confusion in the administration of law and justice by the courts in handling of claims for betterments and improvements made by holders of tax titles, and for the promotion of justice, the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, an emergency is therefore declared and this act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage and approval.”

18-60-201. Right of action generally.

The action of ejectment may be maintained in all cases in which the plaintiff is legally entitled to the possession of the premises.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 53, § 1; C. & M. Dig., § 3686; Pope's Dig., § 4641; A.S.A. 1947, § 34-1401.

Cross References.

Action by state for recovery of possession, §16-106-105.

18-60-202. Actions relating to public lands.

(a)

The action of ejectment may be maintained in all cases in which the plaintiff claims the possession of the premises under or by virtue of:

(1)

An entry made with the register and receiver of the proper land office of the United States;

(2)

A preemption right under the laws of the United States; or

(3)

When an improvement has been made by him or her on any of the public lands of the United States, whether the lands have been surveyed or not, and when any person, other than those to whom the right of action is given by subdivisions (a)(1) and (2) of this section, is in possession of the improvement.

(b)

An action of trespass may also be maintained in all the cases enumerated in subsection (a) of this section.

(c)

The executor or administrator of any person who has died and who in his or her lifetime made improvements on any of the public lands of the United States, whether he or she had a right of preemption to the improvements or not under the laws of the United States, or whether the lands on which the improvements may have been made have been surveyed or not, may maintain an action of ejectment for the recovery of the improvement, to the same extent and with the same restrictions as provided by subsection (a) of this section, for their testator or intestate.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 53, §§ 2, 3, 19; C. & M. Dig., §§ 3687, 3688, 3702; Pope's Dig., §§ 4642, 4643, 4657; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 34-1402, 34-1403, 34-1429.

18-60-203. Possession claimed under state patents.

(a)

The action of ejectment may be maintained in all cases when the plaintiff claims the possession of the premises under or by virtue of an entry made with the proper swampland agent or land agent of the proper land office of the State of Arkansas.

(b)

The patent certificates granted by any of the named officers shall be evidence of title in the party to whom it is granted.

History.

Acts 1857, § 1, p. 170; C. & M. Dig., § 3690; Pope's Dig., § 4645; A.S.A. 1947, § 34-1405.

18-60-204. Parties.

(a)

The action of ejectment shall be brought and prosecuted in the real names of the parties thereunto.

(b)

The action may be brought against the person in possession of the premises claimed or his or her lessor, or both.

(c)

The person from or through whom the defendant claims title to the premises may, on his or her motion, be made a codefendant.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 53, §§ 4, 5; C. & M. Dig., §§ 3683-3685; Pope's Dig., §§ 4638-4640; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 34-1406, 34-1407.

18-60-205. Pleadings.

(a)(1)

In all actions for the recovery of lands, except in actions of forcible entry and unlawful detainer, the plaintiff shall set forth in his or her complaint all deeds and other written evidences of title on which he or she relies for the maintenance of his or her suit.

(2)

The plaintiff shall file copies of the evidences as far as they can be obtained, as exhibits therewith, and shall state such facts as shall show a prima facie title in himself or herself to the land in controversy.

(b)

The defendant in his or her answer shall plead in the same manner as required from the plaintiff. The defendant in his or her answer shall set forth exceptions to any of the documentary evidence relied on by the plaintiff to which he or she may wish to object, and the exceptions shall specifically note the objections taken.

(c)

The plaintiff shall in the same manner, within three (3) days after the filing of the answer, unless longer time is given by the court, file like exceptions to any documentary evidence exhibited by the defendant.

(d)

All the exceptions shall be passed on by the court and shall be sustained or overruled, as the law may require. If any exception is sustained to any of the evidence, it shall not be used at the trial unless the defect for which the exception is taken shall be covered by amendment.

(e)

All objections to the evidence not specifically pointed out in the manner provided in this section shall be waived.

History.

Acts 1875, No. 104, §§ 1-3, p. 229; C. & M. Dig., §§ 3691-3693; Pope's Dig., §§ 4646-4648; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 34-1408 — 34-1410.

18-60-206. Proof required to recover.

(a)

To entitle the plaintiff to recover, it shall be sufficient for him or her to show that, at the time of the commencement of the action, the defendant was in possession of the premises claimed and that the plaintiff had title thereto or had the right to the possession thereof as is declared by §§18-60-201 and18-60-202 to be sufficient to maintain the action of ejectment.

(b)

If the action is brought by a joint tenant or tenant in common against his or her cotenant, the plaintiff shall also be required to show at the trial that the defendant actually ousted him or her or did some act amounting to a total denial of his or her right as a cotenant.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 53, §§ 11, 12; C. & M. Dig., §§ 3694, 3695; Pope's Dig., §§ 4649, 4650; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 34-1411, 34-1412.

18-60-207. Judgments.

(a)

In all cases in which no other provision is made, the judgment, if for the plaintiff, shall be for the recovery of the possession of the premises and the damages and costs.

(b)

If judgment should be rendered against the defendant, the judgment shall be for the recovery of the premises, and a writ of inquiry shall be awarded to assess the damages.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 53, §§ 15, 18; C. & M. Dig., §§ 3698, 3701; Pope's Dig., §§ 4653, 4656; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 34-1416, 34-1417.

18-60-208. Writ of possession.

When the judgment for the plaintiff is both for the recovery of the possession of the premises and for the damages, the plaintiff may have a writ of possession. The writ shall command the officer to whom it may be directed to deliver to the plaintiff possession of the premises and also command him or her to levy and collect the damages and costs, as in executions on judgments in personal actions.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 53, § 16; C. & M. Dig., § 3699; Pope's Dig., § 4654; A.S.A. 1947, § 34-1418.

18-60-209. Recovery of damages.

(a)

If the plaintiff prevails in the action, he or she shall recover by way of damages the rents and profits down to the time of assessing them.

(b)

When the plaintiff or those under whom he or she claims title may have entered in any land office of the United States within this state the improvement of the defendant and the action is brought to recover the possession of the improvement the plaintiff shall recover no damages.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 53, § 13; C. & M. Dig., § 3696; Pope's Dig., § 4651; A.S.A. 1947, § 34-1413.

18-60-210. Execution for damages and costs only.

When the judgment for the plaintiff is only for damages and costs, execution may be issued thereon as on judgments in personal actions.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 53, § 17; C. & M. Dig., § 3700; Pope's Dig., § 4655; A.S.A. 1947, § 34-1415.

18-60-211. Expiration of right to possession pending action.

If the right of the plaintiff to the possession of the premises expires after the commencement of the action and before the trial, the verdict shall be returned according to the facts and judgment shall be entered only for the damages and costs.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 53, § 14; C. & M. Dig., § 3697; Pope's Dig., § 4652; A.S.A. 1947, § 34-1414.

18-60-212. Recovery of lands held under tax title.

(a)

No action for the recovery of any lands or for the possession thereof against any person, or his or her heirs or assigns, who may hold such lands by virtue of a purchase thereof at a sale by the collector or Commissioner of State Lands, for the nonpayment of taxes, or who may have purchased them from the state by virtue of any act providing for the sale of lands forfeited to the state or the nonpayment of taxes, or who may hold the land under a donation deed from the state, shall be maintained unless it appears that the plaintiff, his or her ancestors, predecessors, or grantors were seized or possessed of the lands in question within two (2) years next before the commencement of the action.

(b)

This section shall not apply to lands which have been sold to any improvement district of any kind or character for taxes due the districts nor to any taxes due any improvement districts, but the lien of the taxes shall continue until paid.

(c)

The person, or his or her heirs or assigns, claiming any land mentioned in subsection (a) of this section shall, before the issuing of any writ, file in the office of the clerk of the proper court an affidavit setting forth that the claimant has tendered to the purchaser or purchasers thereof, or his or her agent or legal representative, the full amount of all taxes and costs first paid on account of the lands, with interest thereon at the rate of one hundred percent (100%) upon the amount first paid for the lands and twenty-five percent (25%) upon all costs and taxes paid upon the land thereafter, from the time the costs and taxes were paid, and also the full value of all improvements of whatever kind and description made on the lands, by the purchaser or purchasers, his or her heirs or assigns, or tenants, and that it has been refused.

(d)

If any action shall be brought in any court of record in this state against any purchaser, or his or her heirs or assigns, holding any lands as specified in subsection (a) of this section, and it shall appear to the satisfaction of the court that no affidavit, as required in subsection (c) of this section, was filed previous to the commencement thereof, it shall be the duty of the court to dismiss the action at the cost of the plaintiff.

(e)

If judgment shall be given against any purchaser, or his or her heirs or assigns who hold any lands as provided for in subsection (a) of this section in favor of any person claiming them, no matter by what manner of title, the judgment shall only be for the possession of the premises in question, and damages shall be assessed in favor of the defendant for the full amount of all taxes, costs, and interest provided for in subsection (c) of this section, together with the full value of all improvements of whatever kind and description made thereon, for which judgment shall be entered in favor of the defendant, and it shall be a lien upon the lands until satisfied.

History.

Acts 1857, §§ 1-4, p. 80; C. & M. Dig., §§ 3708-3710, 6947; Pope's Dig., §§ 4663-4665, 8925; Acts 1945, No. 82, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 34-1419 — 34-1422.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

As enacted, Acts 1857, § 2, p. 80, in part, required that the affidavit set forth a tender by the claimant to the purchaser of the full amount of all taxes and costs first paid on account of the lands, with interest on them “at the rate of one hundred percentum upon the amount first paid for said lands and twenty-five percentum upon all costs and taxes paid upon said land thereafter.” The interest provisions of Acts 1857, § 2, p. 80, may have been superseded by Acts 1883, No. 114, § 139, as amended by Acts 1893, No. 34, § 1 and 1967, No. 502, § 1, which provided for the redemption of land sold for taxes and for the payment of ten percent (10%) annual interest on the taxes for which the land was first sold, the penalties and costs thereon and the taxes which the purchaser subsequently paid on the land. Acts 1883, No. 114, § 139, as amended, was superseded by §§26-37-101 —26-37-105,26-37-201 —26-37-205 and26-37-301 —26-37-303.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1857, § 1, p. 80, as amended, is also codified as §18-61-106.

Cross References.

Right of compensation for improvements, §26-37-209.

18-60-213. Recovery for improvements and taxes paid on land of another.

(a)

If any person believing himself or herself to be the owner, either in law or equity, under color of title has peaceably improved, or shall peaceably improve, any land which upon judicial investigation shall be decided to belong to another, the value of the improvement made as stated and the amount of all taxes which may have been paid on the land by the person, and those under whom he or she claims, shall be paid by the successful party to the occupant, or the person under whom, or from whom, he or she entered and holds, before the court rendering judgment in the proceedings shall cause possession to be delivered to the successful party.

(b)(1)

The court or jury trying the cause shall assess the value of the improvements in the same action in which the title to the lands is adjudicated.

(2)

On the trial, the damages sustained by the owner of the lands from waste and any mesne profits as may be allowed by law shall also be assessed.

(c)(1)

If the value of the improvements made by the occupant and the taxes paid as stated in subsection (a) of this section shall exceed the amount of the damages and mesne profits combined, the court shall enter an order as a part of the final judgment providing that no writ shall issue for the possession of the lands in favor of the successful party until payment has been made to the occupant of the balance due him or her for the improvements and the taxes paid.

(2)

This amount shall be a lien on the lands, which may be enforced by equitable proceedings at any time within three (3) years after the date of the judgment.

(d)

In recoveries against the occupants, no account for any mesne profits shall be allowed unless they shall have accrued within three (3) years prior to the commencement of the suit in which they may be claimed.

(e)

In any of these equitable proceedings, the court may allow to the owner of the lands, as a setoff against the value of the improvements and taxes, the value of all rents accruing after the date of the judgment in which it has been allowed.

History.

Acts 1883, No. 69, §§ 1-4, p. 106; C. & M. Dig., §§ 3703-3706; Pope's Dig., §§ 4658-4661; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 34-1423 — 34-1426.

18-60-214. Lien of tax deed holder for improvement by reason of survey.

(a)(1)

If any person believing himself or herself to be the owner, either in law or equity, under a clerk's tax deed or a Commissioner of State Lands' forfeited land deed, containing a valid and proper description constituting color of title, has, or shall, peaceably improve any land by having the boundaries surveyed and corners established by the county surveyor of the county in which the land is situated and, upon judicial investigation of the title to the land, it is found that the forfeiture for nonpayment of taxes is void and that the land belongs to another or that the former owner is entitled to redeem from the tax forfeiture, the value of the improvement to the land by reason of the survey shall be paid by the successful party to the holder of the tax deed.

(2)

The holder of the tax deed shall have a lien on the lands for this amount, which may be enforced by equitable proceedings at any time within three (3) years after the date of the judgment.

(b)

This section shall not repeal any statute providing for recovery of improvements and betterments but shall be cumulative to §18-60-213(a) and to all other existing laws not inconsistent with it.

History.

Acts 1947, No. 87, §§ 1, 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 34-1427, 34-1428.

Subchapter 3

— Forcible Entry and Detainer — Unlawful Detainer

Cross References.

Exemption of banks and savings and loans institutions from bond requirement, §23-32-301 et seq.

Limitation of actions, §18-61-104.

Effective Dates.

Acts 1981, No. 615, § 14: approved Mar. 23, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “The procedure by which tenants may preserve their rights to possession of property and landlords, entitled thereto, may recover possession in appropriate cases is a matter of vital importance to the public health, safety and welfare, and the clarification of certain confusion which exists with respect thereto in the current law being necessary for the preservation of the public health, safety and welfare, this Act shall be and remain in full force and effect from and after the date of its passage.”

18-60-301. Legislative intent.

(a)

Acts 1875, No. 85 [repealed], as amended by Acts 1875 (Adj. Sess.) No. 56; Acts 1891, No. 8 [repealed] and Acts 1947, No. 373 [repealed], which declare and describe the cause of action for forcible entry and detainer and unlawful detainer and prescribe the procedure for carrying out the rights and remedies granted to affected parties thereunder, is in need of clarification and revision in order that persons affected thereby may be afforded reasonable opportunity to be heard on legitimate objections to writs of possession entered in accordance with the provisions of this law.

(b)

It is, therefore, found to be to the best interest of the people of this state that an additional procedure be specifically prescribed for the enforcement of the rights of parties claiming a cause of action by reason of forcible entry and detainer or unlawful detainer of real property and those persons against whom such causes of action are brought.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 615, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 34-1501.

18-60-302. Improper entry prohibited.

No person shall enter into or upon any lands, tenements, or other possessions and detain or hold them except when an entry is given by law, and then only in a peaceable manner.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 615, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 34-1502.

18-60-303. Actions constituting forcible entry and detainer.

A person shall be guilty of a forcible entry and detainer within the meaning of this subchapter if the person shall:

(1)

Enter into or upon any lands, tenements, or other possessions and detain or hold them without right or claim to title;

(2)

Enter by breaking open the doors and windows or other parts of the house, whether any person is in it or not;

(3)

Threaten to kill, maim, or beat the party in possession or use words and actions as have a natural tendency to excite fear or apprehension of danger;

(4)

Put out of doors or carry away the goods of the party in possession; or

(5)

Enter peaceably and then turning out by force or frightening by threats or other circumstances of terror the party to yield possession.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 615, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 34-1503.

18-60-304. Actions constituting unlawful detainer.

A person shall be guilty of an unlawful detainer within the meaning of this subchapter if the person shall, willfully and without right:

(1)

Hold over any land, tenement, or possession after the determination of the time for which it was demised or let to him or her, or the person under whom he or she claims;

(2)

Peaceably and lawfully obtain possession of any land, tenement, or possession and hold it willfully and unlawfully after demand made in writing for the delivery or surrender of possession of the land, tenement, or possession by the person having the right to possession or his or her agent or attorney;

(3)

Fail or refuse to pay the rent for the land, tenement, or possession when due, and after three (3) days' notice to quit and demand made in writing for the possession of the land, tenement, or possession by the person entitled to the land, tenement, or possession or his or her agent or attorney, shall refuse to quit possession;

(4)

Fail to maintain the premises in a safe, healthy, or habitable condition; or

(5)

Cause or permit the premises to become:

(A)

A common nuisance subject to abatement under:

(i)

Section 14-54-1501 et seq.;

(ii)

The Arkansas Drug Abatement Act of 1989, §16-105-401 et seq.; or

(iii)

Any other law of this state; or

(B)

A public or common nuisance under §14-54-1701 et seq. as determined by a criminal nuisance abatement board.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 615, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 34-1504; Acts 2005, No. 1431, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2005 amendment added (4) and (5) and made related changes.

18-60-305. Applicability to all estates.

Sections 18-60-303 and 18-60-304 shall extend to and comprehend all estates, whether freehold or less than freehold.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 615, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 34-1505.

18-60-306. Jurisdiction — Definition.

(a)

Forcible entries and detainers and unlawful detainers are cognizable before the:

(1)

Circuit court of any county in which the offenses may be committed; and

(2)

District court with jurisdiction concurrent with the jurisdiction of the circuit court, if permitted by rule or order of the Supreme Court.

(b)

As used in this subchapter, “court” means:

(1)

A circuit court; and

(2)

If permitted by rule or order of the Supreme Court, a district court.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 615, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 34-1506; Acts 2007, No. 535, § 1.